en: E429, peptone, tryptone
xx: E429
cs: E429, Pepton, Peptóny
de: E429, Pepton, Peptonwasser, Trypton
es: E429, Peptona
fi: E429, peptoni, tryptoni, peptonia, tryptonia
fr: E429, Peptones, Peptone, E 429
hu: E429, Pepton
nl: E429, Tryptoon
pl: E429, Peptony, Pepton
pt: E429, Peptona, Peptonas
sv: E429, Pepton

en: E430, Polyoxyethylene (8) stearate
xx: E430
es: E430, Polioxietilen (8) estearato, Polioxietilen estearato, Polioxietilen (20) estearato, Polioxietilen estearato
fi: E430, Polyoksietyleeni(8)monostearaatti, Polyoksietyleeni(8)monostearaattia
fr: E430, Stéarate de polyoxyéthylène (8)
hu: E430, Polioxietilén-8-sztearát
nl: E430, Polyoxyleen-8-stearaat

en: E431, Polyoxyethylene (40) stearate, Polyoxyl (40) stearate
xx: E431
bg: E431, Полиоксиетилен (40) стеарат, Полиоксил (40) стеарат
ca: E431, Estearat de polioxietilè (40)
cs: E431, Polyoxyethylen (40) stearan, Poly(oxyethylen(40))-stearát, Polyoxyl(40)-stearát
da: E431, Polyoxyethylen (40) stearat, Polyoxyl(40)stearat
de: E431, Polyoxyethylen(40)stearat, Polyoxyl(40)stearat
el: E431, Στεατικο πολυοξυαιθυλενιο (40)
es: E431, Estearato de polioxietileno (40), Estearato de polioxilo (40)
et: E431, Polüoksüetüleen(40)stearaat, Polüoksüül(40)stereaat
fi: E431, Polyoksyetyleeni(40)stearaatti, Polyoksyyli(40)stearaatti, Polyoksyetyleeni(40)stearaattia, Polyoksyyli(40)stearaattia
fr: E431, Stéarate de polyoxyéthylène (40), Polyoxyethylene (40) stearate, Stéarate de polyoxyéthylène 40
hu: E431, Polioxietilén(40)-sztearát, Polioxil(40)-sztearát
it: E431, Stearato di poliossietilene(40), Stearato poliossile (40)
lt: E431, Polioksietileno (40) stearatas, Polioksilo (40) stearatas
lv: E431, Polioksietilēna (40) stearāts, Polioksil (40) stearāts
mt: E431, Stearat tal-poliossietilen (40), Stearat Poliossiliku (40)
nl: E431, Polyoxyethyleen(40)stearaat, Polyoxyl-40-stearaat
pl: E431, Stearynian polioksyetylenu (40), Stearynian polioksylu (40)
pt: E431, Estearato de polioxietileno (40), Estearato de polioxilo (40)
ro: E431, Stearat de polioxietilenă (40), Stearat de polioxil (40)
sk: E431, Polyoxyetylén (40) stearát, Polyoxyl (40) stearát
sl: E431, Polioksietilen (40) stearat, polioksil (40) stearat
sv: E431, Polyoxietylen(40)stearat, Polyoxyl(40)stearat

en: E432, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monolaurate, Polysorbate 20, Alkest TW 20, Tween 20, PEG(20)sorbitan monolaurate
xx: E432
bg: E432, Полиоксиетилен сорбитан монолаурат, Полисорбат 20
ca: E432, Monolaurat de sorbitan polioxietilenat, polisorbat 20
cs: E432, Polyoxyethylensorbitanmonolaurát, polysorbát 20
da: E432, Polyoxyethylen(20)sorbitanmonolaurat, Polysorbat 20
de: E432, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitanmonolaurat, Polysorbat 20, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitan-monolaurat, E 432, Tween 20
el: E432, Μονολαυρικη πολυοξυ-αιθυλενο-σορβιτανη, Polysorbate 20
es: E432, Monolaurato de sorbitán polioxietilenado, Polioxietilen sorbitan monolaurato, Polisorbato 20, Tween 20
et: E432, Polüoksüetüleen sorbitaanmonolaureaat, Polüsorbaat 20
fi: E432, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimonolauraatti, Polysorbaatti 20, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimonolauraattia
fr: E432, Monolaurate de polyoxyéthylène sorbitane, polysorbate 20, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monolaurate (polysorbate 20), Stéarate de polyoxyl (40), Monolaurate de sorbitane polyoxyéthylène, Tween 20
hu: E432, Polioxietilén-szorbitan-monolaurát, Poliszorbát 20, Polioxietilén(20)-szorbitán-laurát
it: E432, Monolaurato di poliossietilene sorbitano, Polisorbato 20
lt: E432, Polioksietileno sorbitano monolauratas, Polisorbatas 20
lv: E432, Polioksietilēna sorbitāna monolaurāts), Polisorbāts 20
mt: E432, Monolawrat tal-poliossietilen sorbitan, Polisorbat 20
nl: E432, Polyoxyethyleensorbitaanmonolauraat, Polysorbaat 20, Tween 20
pl: E432, Monolaurynian polioksyetylenosorbitolu), Polisorbat 20
pt: E432, Monolaurato de polioxietileno sorbitano, Polissorbato 20
ro: E432, Monolaurat de polioxietilenă sorbitan, Polisorbat 20
sk: E432, Polyoxylénsorbitanmonolaurát, Polysorbát 20
sl: E432, Polioksietilen sorbitan monolaurat, polisorbat 20
sv: E432, Polyoxietylensorbitanmonolaurat, Polysorbat 20

en: E433, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monooleate, Polysorbate 80
xx: E433
bg: E433, Полиоксиетилен сорбитан моноолеат, Полисорбат 80
ca: E433, Monooleat de sorbitan polioxietilenat, polisorbat 80
cs: E433, Polyoxyethylensorbitanmonooleát, polysorbát 80
da: E433, Polyoxyethylen(20)sorbitanmonooleat, Polysorbat 80
de: E433, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitanmonooleat, Polysorbat 80, E 433, Tween 80, Polyoxyethylen(20)-sorbitanmono-Oleat
el: E433, Μονοελαϊκη πολυοξυ-αιθυλενο-σορβιτανη, Polysorbate 80
es: E433, Monooleato de sorbitán polioxietilenado, Polioxietilen sorbitan monooleato, Polisorbato 80
et: E433, Polüoksüetüleen sorbitaanmonooleaat, Polüsorbaat 80
fi: E433, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimono-oleaatti, Polysorbaatti 80, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimono-oleaattia
fr: E433, Monooléate de polyoxyéthylène de sorbitane, polysorbate 80, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monooleate (polysorbate 80)
hr: E433, polioksietilen sorbitan monooleat
hu: E433, Polioxietilén-szorbitan-monooleát, Poliszorbát 80, Polioxietilén(20)-szorbitán-oleát
it: E433, Monoleato di poliossietilene sorbitano, Polisorbato 80
lt: E433, Polioksietileno sorbitano monooleatas, Polisorbatas 80
lv: E433, Polioksietilēna sorbitāna monooleāts, Polisorbāts 80
mt: E433, Monooleat tal-poliossietilen sorbitan, Polisorbat 80
nl: E433, Polyoxyethyleensorbitaanmonoöleaat, Polysorbaat 80
pl: E433, Monooleinian polioksyetylenosorbitolu, Polisorbat 80, Tween 80
pt: E433, Mono-oleato de polioxietileno sorbitano, Polissorbato 80
ro: E433, Monooleat de polioxietilenă sorbitan, Polisorbat 80
sk: E433, Polyoxylénsorbitanmonooleát, Polysorbát 80
sl: E433, Polioksietilen sorbitan monooleat, polisorbat 80
sv: E433, Polyoxietylensorbitanmonooleat, Polysorbat 80

en: E434, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monopalmitate, Polysorbate 40
xx: E434
bg: E434, Полиоксиетилен сорбитан монопалмитат, Полисорбат 40
ca: E434, Monopalmitat de sorbitan polioxietilenat, polisorbat 40
cs: E434, Polyoxyethylensorbitanmonopalmitát, polysorbát 40
da: E434, Polyoxyethylen(20)sorbitanmonopalmitat, Polysorbat 40
de: E434, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitanmonopalmitat, Polysorbat 40
el: E434, Μονοπαλμιτικη πολυοξυ-αιθυλενο-σορβιτανη, Polysorbate 40
es: E434, Monopalmitato de sorbitán polioxietilenado, Polioxietilen sorbitan monopalmitato, Polisorbato 40
et: E434, Polüoksüetüleen sorbitaanmonopalmitaat, Polüsorbaat 40
fi: E434, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimonopalmitaatti, Polysorbaatti 40, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimonopalmitaattia
fr: E434, Monopalmitate de polyoxyéthylène sorbitane, polysorbate 40, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monopalmitate (polysorbate 40)
hu: E434, Polioxietilén-szorbitan-monopalmitát, Poliszorbát 40
it: E434, Monopalmitato di poliossietilene sorbitano, Polisorbato 40
lt: E434, Polioksietileno sorbitano monopalmitatas, Polisorbatas 40
lv: E434, Polioksietilēna sorbitāna monopalmitāts, Polisorbāts 40
mt: E434, Monopalmitat tal-poliossietilen sorbitan, Polisorbat 40
nl: E434, Polyoxyethyleensorbitaanmonopalmitaat, Polysorbaat 40
pl: E434, Monopalmitynian polioksyetylenosorbitolu, Polisorbat 40
pt: E434, Monopalmitato de polioxietileno sorbitano, Polissorbato 40
ro: E434, Monopalmitat de polioxietilenă sorbitan, Polisorbat 40
sk: E434, Polyoxyetylénsorbitanmonopalmitát, Polysorbát 40
sl: E434, Polioksietilen sorbitan monopalmitat, polisorbat 40
sv: E434, Polyoxietylensorbitanmonopalmitat, Polysorbat 40

en: E435, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monostearate, Polysorbate 60
xx: E435
bg: E435, Полиоксиетилен сорбитан моностеарат, Полисорбат 60
ca: E435, Monoestearat de sorbitan polioxietilenat, polisorbat 60
cs: E435, Polyoxyethylensorbitanmonostearát, polysorbát 60
da: E435, Polyoxyethylen(20)sorbitanmonostearat, Polysorbat 60
de: E435, Polyoxyethylen-Sorbitanmonostearat, Polysorbat 60, E 435, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitan-monostearat, Polyoxyethylen(20)-sorbitan-monostearat
el: E435, Μονοστεατικη πολυοξυ-αιθυλενο-σορβιτανη, Polysorbate 60
es: E435, Monoestearato de sorbitán polioxietilenado, Polioxietilen sorbitan monoestearato, Polisorbato 60
et: E435, Polüosküetüleen sorbitaanmonostearaat, Polüsorbaat 60
fi: E435, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimonostearaatti, Polysorbaatti 60, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanimonostearaattia
fr: E435, Monostéarate de polyoxyéthylène sorbitane, polysorbate 60, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan monostearate (polysorbate 60)
hr: E435, polisorbat 60
hu: E435, Polioxietilén-szorbitan-monosztearát, Poliszorbát 60
it: E435, Monostearato di poliossietilene sorbitano, Polisorbato 60
lt: E435, Polioksietileno sorbitano monostearatas, Polisorbatas 60
lv: E435, Polioksietilēna sorbitāna monostearāts, Polisorbāts 60
mt: E435, Monostereat tal-poliossietilen sorbitan, Polisorbat 60
nl: E435, Polyoxyethyleensorbitaanmonostearaat, Polysorbaat 60
pl: E435, Monostearynian polioksyetylenosorbitolu, Polisorbat 60
pt: E435, Monoestearato de polioxietileno sorbitano, Polissorbato 60
ro: E435, Monostearat de polioxietilenă sorbitan, Polisorbat 60
sk: E435, Polyoxyetylénsorbitanmonostearát, Polysorbát 60
sl: E435, Polioksietilen sorbitan monostearat, polisorbat 60
sv: E435, Polyoxietylensorbitanmonostearat, Polysorbat 60

en: E436, Polyoxyethylene sorbitan tristearate, Polysorbate 65
xx: E436
bg: E436, Полиоксиетилен сорбитан тристеарат, Полисорбат 65
ca: E436, Triestearat de sorbitan polioxietilenat, polisorbat 65
cs: E436, Polyoxyethylensorbitantristearát, polysorbát 65
da: E436, Polyoxyethylen(20)sorbitantristearat, Polysorbat 65
de: E436, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitantristearat, Polysorbat 65, E 436, Tween 65, Polyoxyethylen-sorbitan-tristearat
el: E436, Τριστεατικη πολυοξυ-αιθυλενο-σορβιτανη, Polysorbate 65
es: E436, Triestearato de sorbitán polioxietilenado, Polisorbato 65
et: E436, Polüosküetüleen sorbitaantristearaat, Polüsorbaat 65
fi: E436, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanitristearaatti, Polysorbaatti 65, Polyoksyetyleenisorbitaanitristearaattia
fr: E436, Tristéarate de polyoxyéthylène sorbitane, polysorbate 65, Tristéarate de polyoxyéthylène sorbitan (polysorbate 65)
hu: E436, Polioxietilén-szorbitan-trisztearát, Poliszorbát 65
it: E436, Tristearato di poliossietilene sorbitano, polisorbato 65
lt: E436, Polioksietileno sorbitano tristearatas, Polisorbatas 65
lv: E436, Polioksietilēna sorbitāna tristearāts, Polisorbāts 65
mt: E436, Tristearat tal-poliossietilen sorbitan, Polisorbat 65
nl: E436, Polyoxyethyleensorbitaantristearaat, Polysorbaat 65
pl: E436, Tristearynian polioksyetylenosorbitolu, Polisorbat 65
pt: E436, Triestearato de polioxietileno sorbitano, Polissorbato 65
ro: E436, Tristearat de polioxietilenă sorbitan, Polisorbat 65
sk: E436, Polyoxyetylénsorbitantristearát, Polysorbát 65
sl: E436, Polioksietilen sorbitan tristearat, polisorbat 65
sv: E436, Polyoxietylensorbitantristearat, Polysorbat 65

en: E440a, Pectin
xx: E440a
da: E440a, Pektin
es: E440a, Pectina
fi: E440a, Pektiini, Pektiiniä
fr: E440a, Pectine
hr: E440a, pektin, pektini, tvar za želiranje pektin, zgušnjivač pektini
hu: E440a, Pektin
sv: E440a, Pektin

en: E440a(ii), Sodium pectate
xx: E440a(ii)
fi: E440a(ii), Natriumpektaatti, Natriumpektaattia
fr: E440a(ii), Pectate de sodium, Sodium pectate
hu: E440a(ii), Nátrium-pektát
nl: E440a(ii), Natriumpectaat

en: E440a(iii), Potassium pectate
xx: E440a(iii)
fi: E440a(iii), Kaliumpektaatti, Kaliumpektaattia
fr: E440a(iii), Pectate de potassium
hu: E440a(iii), Kálium-pektát
nl: E440a(iii), Kaliumpectaat

en: E440a(iv), Ammonium Pectate
xx: E440a(iv)
fi: E440a(iv), Ammoniumpektaatti, Ammoniumpektaattia
fr: E440a(iv), Pectate d'ammonium
hu: E440a(iv), Ammónium-pektát
nl: E440a(iv), Ammoniumpectaat

en: E440b, pectin amide, amidated pectin
xx: E440b
ar: E440b, بكتين أميد
az: E440b, amidləşdirilmiş pektin
bg: E440b, амидиран пектин
ca: E440b, pectina amidada
cs: E440b, amidovaný pektin
da: E440b, amideret pektin
de: E440b, amidiertes Pektin
el: E440b, αμιδωμένη πηκτίνη
eo: E440b, amidita pektino
es: E440b, pectina amidada
et: E440b, amiiditud pektiin
fi: E440b, Amidoitu pektiini, Amidoitua pektiiniä
fr: E440b, Pectine amidée
he: E440b, פקטין אמידי
hi: E440b, एमिडित पेक्टिन
hr: E440b, amidirani pektin
hu: E440b, Pektin-amid, amidált pektin
id: E440b, pektin teramidasi
it: E440b, pectina amidata
ja: E440b, アミド化ペクチン
ko: E440b, 아미드화 펙틴
lt: E440b, amidintas pektinas
lv: E440b, amidēts pektīns
mk: E440b, амидиран пектин
mt: E440b, pektin amidat
nl: E440b, geamideerde pectine
pl: E440b, pektyna amidowana
pt: E440b, pectina amidada
ro: E440b, pectină amidată
ru: E440b, амидированный пектин
sk: E440b, amidovaný pektín
sl: E440b, amidirani pektin
sr: E440b, амидирани пектин
sv: E440b, amiderat pektin
tr: E440b, amidlenmiş pektin
uk: E440b, амідірованний пектин
zh: E440b, 酰胺化果胶

en: E440, Pectins, pectin
xx: E440
af: E440, Pektien
ar: E440, بكتين
az: E440, Pektin maddələri
be: E440, пекцінавыя рэчывы
bg: E440, Пектин, пектини
bs: E440, Pektin
ca: E440, Pectina, pectines
cs: E440, Pektin, Pektiny
cy: E440, Pectin
da: E440, Pektiner, Pectiner, Pektin
de: E440, Pektine, Polygalacturonat, Pektin, Protopektin, Pectin, Rhamnogalacturonan
el: E440, Πηκτίνη
eo: E440, Pektino
es: E440, Pectinas, Pectina
et: E440, Pektiin
eu: E440, Pektina
fa: E440, پکتین
fi: E440, Pektiini, Pektiinit, Pektiiniä, Pektiinejä
fr: E440, Pectines, Pectine
ga: E440, Peictin
gl: E440, Pectina
he: E440, פקטין
hr: E440, pektin, eko pektin
hu: E440, Pektin, Pektinek
hy: E440, Պեկտինյան նյութեր
id: E440, Pektin
io: E440, Pektino
it: E440, Pectina, Pectine
ja: E440, ペクチン
kk: E440, Пектин
ko: E440, 펙틴
ky: E440, Пектиндер
lt: E440, Pektinas
lv: E440, pektīnvielas
nb: E440, Pektiner
nl: E440, Pectine, pectines, pectinen
nn: E440, pektin
pl: E440, Pektyny, Pektyna
pt: E440, Pectina, pectinas
ro: E440, Pectină, pectina
ru: E440, Пектин, Пектиновые вещества, Пектиновое вещество, Пектины
sh: E440, Pektin
sk: E440, Pektín
sl: E440, Pektin
sr: E440, пектин
sv: E440, Pektiner
ta: E440, பெக்டின்
th: E440, เพกทิน
tr: E440, Pektin
uk: E440, Pektin
vi: E440, Pectin
zh: E440, 果胶

en: E440(i), non-amidated pectines
xx: E440(i)
ca: E440(i), Pectina no amidada
es: E440(i), Pectina no amidada
fr: E440(i), Pectine non amidée
nl: E440(i), Niet-geamideerde pectines

en: E440(ii), Amidated pectin
xx: E440(ii)
bg: E440(ii), Амидиран пектин
ca: E440(ii), Pectina amidada
cs: E440(ii), Amidovaný pektin
da: E440(ii), Amideret pectin
de: E440(ii), Amidiertes pektin
el: E440(ii), Αμιδιωμενες πηκτινικες υλες
es: E440(ii), Pectina amidada
et: E440(ii), Amiiditud pektiin
fi: E440(ii), Amidoitu pektiini, Amidoitua pektiiniä
fr: E440(ii), Pectine amidée
hu: E440(ii), Amidált pektin
it: E440(ii), Pectina amidata
lt: E440(ii), Amidintas pektinas
lv: E440(ii), Amidēts pektīns
mt: E440(ii), Pektina amidata
nl: E440(ii), Geamideerde pectine
pl: E440(ii), Pektyna amidowana
pt: E440(ii), Pectina amidada
ro: E440(ii), Pectină amidată
sk: E440(ii), Amidovaný pektín
sl: E440(ii), Amidirani pektin
sv: E440(ii), Amiderat pektin

en: E441, Superglycerinated hydrogenated rapeseed oil, Hydrogenated rapeseed oil superglycerinated, Superglycerinated fully hydrogenated rapeseed oil
xx: E441
es: E441, Aceite de semillas de colza superglicerinado hidrogenado
fi: E441, Superglyseroitu hydrattu rypsiöljy
fr: E441, Huile de colza superglycérinée hydrogénée
it: E441
nl: E441

en: E442, Ammonium phosphatides, Mixed ammonium salts of phosphorylated glycerides, Emulsifier YN, Ammonium phosphatide
xx: E442
bg: E442, Амониеви фосфатиди
ca: E442, Fosfàtid d'amoni, fosfatid d'amoni
cs: E442, Amonné soli fosfatidových kyselin
da: E442, Ammoniumphosphatider
de: E442, Ammoniumphosphatide
el: E442, Φωσφατιδια του αμμωνιου
es: E442, Fosfátidos de amonio, Lecitina YN
et: E442, Fosfatiidhappe ammooniumsoolad, Ammooniumfosfatiidid
fi: E442, Ammoniumfosfatidit, Fosfatidihapon ammoniumsuolat
fr: E442, Phosphatides d'ammonium, E 442
hr: E442, amonijevi fosfatidi, emulgator amonijevi fosfatidi
hu: E442, Ammónium-foszfatidok, Foszfatidsav ammóniumsói, emulgator e442
it: E442, Fosfatidi di ammonio
lt: E442, Amonio fosfatidai
lv: E442, Amonija fosfatīdi, Fosfatīdskābes amonija sāļi
mt: E442, Fosfatidi tal-ammonju
nl: E442, Ammoniumfosfatiden
pl: E442, Fosfatydy amonu
pt: E442, Fosfatidos de amónio
ro: E442, Fosfatide de amoniu
sk: E442, Fosfatidy amónne
sl: E442, Amonijevi fosfatidi
sv: E442, Ammoniumfosfatider, Ammoniumsalter av fosfatinsyra

en: E443, Brominated vegetable oil
xx: E443
ar: E443, زيت نباتي مبروم
az: E443, Bromlaşdırılmış bitki yağı
bg: E443, Бромирано растително масло
ca: E443, Oli vegetal bromat
cs: E443, Bromovaný rostlinný olej
da: E443, Bromeret vegetabilsk olie
de: E443, Bromiertes Pflanzenöl
el: E443, Βρωμιούχο φυτικό έλαιο
eo: E443, Bromigita vegetala oleo
es: E443, Aceite vegetal bromado
et: E443, Bromitud taimne õli
fa: E443, روغن نباتی برم دار
fi: E443, Bromattu kasviöljy, Bromattua kasviöljyä
fr: E443, Huile végétale bromée, brominated vegetable oil
he: E443, שמן צמחי מבורמם
hi: E443, ब्रोमिनेटेड वनस्पति तेल
hr: E443, Bromirano biljno ulje
hu: E443, Brómozott növényi olaj
id: E443, Minyak nabati terbrominasi
it: E443, Olio vegetale bromurato
ja: E443, 臭素化植物油
ko: E443, 브롬화 식물성 기름
lt: E443, Bromintas augalinis aliejus
lv: E443, Bromēta augu eļļa
mk: E443, Бромиран растително масло
ms: E443, Minyak sayuran berbromin
mt: E443, Żejt veġetali brominat
nl: E443, Gebromeerde plantaardige olie
pl: E443, Bromowany olej roślinny
pt: E443, Óleo vegetal bromado
ro: E443, Ulei vegetal bromurat
ru: E443, Бромированное растительное масло
sk: E443, Bromovaný rastlinný olej
sl: E443, Bromirano rastlinsko olje
sr: E443, Броминовано биљно уље
sv: E443, Bromerad vegetabilisk olja
th: E443, น้ำมันพืชโบรมีน
tr: E443, Bromlu bitkisel yağ
uk: E443, Бромована рослинна олія
vi: E443, Dầu thực vật brom hóa
zh: E443, 溴化植物油

en: E444, Sucrose acetate isobutyrate
xx: E444
bg: E444, Захароза ацетат изобутират
ca: E444, Acetat isobutirat de sacarosa
cs: E444, Isobutyrát octanu sacharosy
da: E444, Saccharoseacetatisobutyrat
de: E444, Saccharoseacetat-isobutyrat, Saccharoseacetatisobutyrat, Saccharose-acetat-isobutyrat, SAIB, E 444
el: E444, Ισοβουτυρικη οξικη σακχαροζη
es: E444, Acetato de isobutirato de sacarosa, Acetato isobutirato de sacarosa
et: E444, Sahharoosdiatsetaatheksaisobutüraat
fi: E444, Sakkaroosiasetaatti-isobutyraatti, SAIB, Sakkaroosiasetaatti-isobutyraattia
fr: E444, Acétate isobutyrate de saccharose
hu: E444, Szacharóz-acetát-izobutirát
it: E444, Acetato isobutirrico di saccarosio
lt: E444, Sacharozės acetato izobutiratas
lv: E444, Saharozes acetāta izobutirāts
mt: E444, Aċetat isobutirat tas-sukrożju
nl: E444, Sucroseacetaatisobutyraat
pl: E444, Octan izomaślanu sacharozy
pt: E444, Acetoisobutirato de sacarose
ro: E444, Acetat izobutirat de zaharoză
sk: E444, Octanizomaselnan sacharózy
sl: E444, Saharozni acetat izobutirat
sv: E444, Sackarosacetatisobutyrat